sv: Bränsleform för eldstad: Bioetanolvätska; Kolbriketter; Komprimerade sågspånsstockar; Eldstartare; Vedstockar; Gelbränsledunkar; Tändvedspinnar; Naturligt kolstycke; Vaxved; Träpellets; Övrigt
pt-BR: Forma de combustível para lareira: Bioetanol líquido; Briquetes de carvão; Toras de serragem comprimida; Iniciadores de fogo; Lenha; Latas de combustível em gel; Gravetos para acender; Carvão natural em pedaços; Troncos de cera; Pelotas de madeira; Outro
da: Pejs' brændselsform: Flydende bioethanol; Kulbriketter; Komprimerede savsmuldsstammer; Brandstartere; Brændestykker; Gelbrændstofdåser; Optændingspinde; Naturligt kul i klumper; Voksbrændestykker; Træpiller; Andet
it: Forma del combustibile per caminetti: Bioetanolo liquido; Bricchette di carbone; Ceppi di segatura compressa; Accendifuoco; Ceppi di legna da ardere; Taniche di carburante in gel; Bastoncini di accensione; Carbone naturale in pezzi; Ceppi di cera; Pellet di legno; Altro
pt-PT: Forma de combustível para lareira: Bioetanol líquido; Briquetes de carvão; Troncos de serragem comprimida; Acendedores; Lenha; Latas de combustível em gel; Paus para acender; Carvão natural em pedaços; Lenha de cera; Péletes de madeira; Outro
sk-SK: Typ paliva do kozubu: Tekutý bioetanol; Uhoľné brikety; Lisované piliny; Zapaľovače; Polená palivového dreva; Nádoby s gélovým palivom; Podpaľovacie triesky; Prírodné kusové uhlie; Voskové polená; Drevené pelety; Iné
en: Fireplace fuel form: Bioethanol liquid; Coal briquettes; Compressed sawdust logs; Fire starters; Firewood logs; Gel fuel cans; Kindling sticks; Natural lump coal; Wax firelogs; Wood pellets; Other
pl: Forma paliwa kominkowego: Płynny bioetanol; Brykiety węglowe; Brykiety z trocin; Podpałki; Kłody drewna opałowego; Puszki z paliwem żelowym; Drobne szczapy (rozpałka); Węgiel kamienny kawałkowy; Kłody woskowe; Pellet drzewny; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Oblika goriva za kamin: Tekoči bioetanol; Premogovni briketi; Stisnjeni hlodi žagovine; Vžigalci ognja; Drva za kurjavo; Pločevinke za gel gorivo; Vžigalne palice; Naravni kosovni premog; Voščena polena; Lesni peleti; Druga
nb: Brenselform for peis: Bioetanolvæske; Kullbriketter; Komprimerte sagflisstokker; Ildstartere; Vedkubber; Gelbrennstoffbokser; Opptenningspinner; Naturlig klumpkull; Voksvedkubber; Trepellets; Annet
de: Form des Kaminbrennstoffs: Bioethanol-Brennflüssigkeit; Kohlebriketts; Komprimierte Sägemehlbriquetts; Zünder; Brennholzscheite; Brennpaste; Anzündholz; Natürliche Stückkohle; Anzündscheite; Holzpellets; Sonstiges
hu: Kandalló tüzelőanyag-forma: Bioetanol folyadék; Szénbrikett; Tömörített fűrészporrönkök; Tűzgyújtók; Tűzifarönkök; Zselés üzemanyagot tartalmazó tartályok; Gyújtóspálcák; Természetes darabos szén; Viasz tűzifa; Fapelletek; Egyéb
es: Forma de combustible para chimenea: Bioetanol líquido; Briquetas de carbón; Troncos de serrín comprimido; Encendedores; Troncos de leña; Bidones de combustible en gel; Palitos para encender; Carbón natural en trozos; Leños de encendido; Pellets de madera; Otros
zh-TW: 壁爐燃料形式: 生質酒精液體; 木炭塊; 壓縮原木木屑; 火種; 柴火; 凝膠燃料罐; 引火棒; 天然塊煤; 引火蠟木; 木顆粒; 其他
ja: 暖炉燃料フォーム: バイオエタノール液; 練炭; 圧縮おがくずログ; ファイヤースターター; 薪ログ; ジェル燃料缶; 焚き付け棒; 天然の塊炭; ワックス薪; 木材ペレット; その他
nl: Brandstofvorm voor haard: Bio-ethanol vloeistof; Steenkoolbriketten; Gecomprimeerde zaagselblokken; Vuurstarters; Brandhoutblokken; Gelbrandstofblikken; Aanmaakhoutjes; Natuurlijke steenkool; Washaardblokken; Houten pellets; Overig
bg-BG: Форма на гориво за камина: Течен биоетанол; Въглищни брикети; Пресовани дървени стърготини; Запалителни устройства; Дърва за огрев; Горивен гел в кутия; Запалителни клечки; Естествен твърд въглен; Восъчни дърва за огрев; Дървесни пелети; Друго
ru: Форма топлива для камина: Жидкий биоэтанол; Угольные брикеты; Спрессованные опилки; Средства для розжига; Дрова; Канистры с гелевым топливом; Прутья для растопки; Натуральный кусковой уголь; Восковые топливные брикеты; Древесные пеллеты; Другое
hr-HR: Oblik goriva za kamin: Tekući bioetanol; Briketi od ugljena; Komprimirane piljevine; Potpaljivači; Cjepanice drva za ogrjev; Kante s gel gorivom; Štapovi za potpalu; Prirodni komadni ugljen; Voštane cjepanice za ogrjev; Drveni peleti; Ostalo
th: รูปแบบเชื้อเพลิงสำหรับเตาผิง: เอทานอลเหลวชีวภาพ; ถ่านหินอัดก้อน; ฟืนไม้ขี้เลื่อยอัดแท่ง; เครื่องจุดไฟ; ไม้ฟืน; กระป๋องเชื้อเพลิงเจล; เศษไม้เชื้อไฟ; ถ่านหินก้อนธรรมชาติ; ฟืนขี้ผึ้ง; แบบไม้อัดเม็ด; อื่นๆ
vi: Dạng nhiên liệu lò sưởi: Chất lỏng Bioethanol; Than bánh; Củi mùn cưa ép; Dụng cụ đánh lửa; Củi gỗ; Lon nhiên liệu dạng gel; Que nhóm lửa; Than củi tự nhiên; Củi sáp nhóm lửa; Viên nén gỗ; Khác
el: Μορφή καυσίμου τζακιού: Υγρή βιοαιθανόλη; Μπρικέτες άνθρακα; Συμπιεσμένα κούτσουρα πριονιδιού; Προσανάμματα για τζάκια; Κορμοί καυσόξυλων; Δοχεία καυσίμου τζελ; Προσανάμματα; Φυσικός χονδρόκοκκος άνθρακας; Κούτσουρα καύσης από κερί; Πέλετ ξύλου; Άλλο
fi: Takan polttoaineen olomuoto: Bioetanolineste; Hiilibriketit; Puristetut sahanpuruklapit; Tulen sytyttimet; Polttopuut; Geelipolttoainesäiliöt; Sytyketikut; Luonnonpuuhiili; Vahapolttopuut; Puupelletit; Muu
lt-LT: Židinio kuro forma: Bioetanolio skystis; Anglies briketai; Presuoti pjuvenų rąstai; Uždegikliai; Malkų rąstai; Gelio kuro kanistrėlės; Užkuro pagaliukai; Natūrali gabalinė anglis; Vaško malkos; Medžio drožlės; Kita
fr: Format du combustible: Bioéthanol liquide; Briquettes de charbon; Bûches de sciure compressée; Allume-feux; Bûches de bois; Cartouches de combustible en gel; Bois d’allumage; Charbon naturel en morceaux; Bûches de cire; Granulés de bois; Autre
ko: 벽난로 연료 형태: 바이오에탄올 액체; 조개탄; 압축 톱밥 장작; 점화기; 땔감 장작; 젤 연료 캔; 불쏘시개; 천연 목탄; 왁스 파이어로그; 목재 펠릿; 기타
zh-CN: 壁炉燃料的形态: 生物乙醇液体; 煤球; 压缩锯末木块; 点火器; 柴火; 凝胶燃料罐; 引火柴; 天然煤块; 蜡木柴; 木屑颗粒; 其他
ro-RO: Forma combustibilului pentru șemineu: Bioetanol lichid; Brichete de cărbune; Bușteni de rumeguș comprimat; Aprinzători; Bușteni de lemn de foc; Canistre de combustibil cu gel; Bețe de aprindere; Cărbune natural în bucăți; Bușteni de foc din ceară; Pelete de lemn; Altele
tr: Şömine yakıt formu: Biyoetanol sıvısı; Kömür briketleri; Sıkıştırılmış talaş kütükleri; Tutuşturucular; Yakacak odun kütükleri; Jel yakıt bidonları; Tutuşturma çubukları; Doğal topak kömür; Mumlu yakacak kütükler; Odun peleti; Diğer
cs: Forma paliva do krbu: Tekutý biolíh; Uhelné brikety; Dřevěné brikety; Podpalovače; Polena palivového dřeva; Plechovky s hořlavým gelem; Třísky na podpal; Přírodní kusové uhlí; Podpalovací brikety; Dřevěné pelety; Jiné